Illinois, session 104th, HB1094.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 16-3 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/16-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 16-3)7    Sec. 16-3. Theft of labor or services or use of property. 8    (a) A person commits theft when he or she knowingly 9obtains the temporary use of property, labor or services of 10another which are available only for hire, by means of threat 11or deception or knowing that such use is without the consent of 12the person providing the property, labor or services. For the 13purposes of this subsection, library material is available for 14hire. 15    (b) A person commits theft when after (1) renting or 16leasing a motor vehicle, (2) obtaining a motor vehicle through 17a "driveaway" service mode of transportation, (3) renting or 18leasing equipment exceeding $500 in value including tools, 19construction or industry equipment, and such items as linens, 20tableware, tents, tables, chairs and other equipment specially 21rented for a party or special event, or (4) renting or leasing 22any other type of personal property exceeding $500 in value, 23under an agreement in writing which provides for the return of   HB1094- 2 -LRB104 05525 RLC 15554 b1the vehicle, equipment, or other personal property to a 2particular place at a particular time, he or she without good 3cause knowingly fails to return the vehicle, equipment, or 4other personal property to that place within the time 5specified, and is thereafter notified through electronic 6means, including email, text, or email and text, or served or 7sent a written demand mailed to the last known address, made by 8certified mail return receipt requested, to return the 9vehicle, equipment, or other personal property within 3 days 10from the mailing of the written demand or 24 hours from the 11notification through electronic means  which includes email, 12text, or email and text, and who without good cause knowingly 13fails to return the vehicle, equipment, or any other personal 14property to any place of business of the lessor within the 15return period or places the vehicle, equipment, or any other 16personal property for sale during the rental period or 17thereafter. The trier of fact may infer evidence that the 18person is without good cause if the person signs the agreement 19with a name or address other than his or her own. 20    (c) A person commits theft when he or she borrows from a 21library facility library material which has an aggregate value 22of $50 or more pursuant to an agreement with or procedure 23established by the library facility for the return of such 24library material, and knowingly without good cause fails to 25return the library material so borrowed in accordance with 26such agreement or procedure, and further knowingly without   HB1094- 3 -LRB104 05525 RLC 15554 b1good cause fails to return such library material within 30 2days after receiving written notice by certified mail from the 3library facility demanding the return of such library 4material. 5    (d) Sentence.6    A person convicted of theft under subsection (a) is guilty 7of a Class A misdemeanor, except that the theft of library 8material where the aggregate value exceeds $300 is a Class 3 9felony. A person convicted of theft under subsection (b) of 10this Section is guilty of a Class 4 felony. A person convicted 11of theft under subsection (c) is guilty of a petty offense for 12which the offender may be fined an amount not to exceed $500 13and shall be ordered to reimburse the library for postage 14costs, attorney's fees, and actual replacement costs of the 15materials not returned, except that theft under subsection (c) 16where the aggregate value exceeds $300 is a Class 3 felony. In 17addition to any other penalty imposed, the court may order a 18person convicted under this Section to reimburse the victims 19or the victims' representatives for court filing costs, 20attorney's fees, and such other related costs or to make 21restitution to the victim of the offense. 22    For the purpose of sentencing on theft of library 23material, separate transactions totalling more than $300 24within a 90-day period shall constitute a single offense. 25(Source: P.A. 99-534, eff. 1-1-17.)